Hawaii statutes.
[§393-23] Joint provision of coverage.
Employers may form associations for the purpose of jointly providing prepaid
health care protection under this chapter for their employees with the
contractors authorized to provide such coverage in the State. [L 1974, c 210,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next